Tennessee, session 114, HB1880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1702(3), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subdivision immediately preceding the period:
who have practiced for twenty (20) years or less
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to privilege taxes due and payable after May 31, 2027.
HB1880
011511
- 1 -